Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,223
Acetylene headlights; number; construction; requirements.

Motor vehicles may be equipped with two acetylene headlights of approximately equal candlepower when equipped with clear, plain glass fronts, bright six-inch spherical mirrors, and standard acetylene five-eighths-foot burners, no more and no less.

Laws 1931, c. 110, § 46, p. 320;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1177;

R.S.1943, § 39-781;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,142;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 319.